nb: Foringsnivå for håndflate: Ekstra kraftig; Kraftig; Lett; Middels; Ingen; Annet
fr: Niveau de rembourrage de la paume: Très épais; Épais; Léger; Moyen; Aucun; Autre
sl-SI: Raven blazinjenja dlani: Izjemno debelo; Debelo; Tanko; Srednje; Brez; Drugo
zh-TW: 手掌墊等級: 超厚; 厚; 薄; 中等; 無; 其他
pl: Poziom wypełnienia dłoni: Bardzo grube; Grube; Cienkie; Średnie; Brak; Inne
sv: Nivå av handflate-dämpning: Extra kraftig; Kraftig; Lätt; Medium; Ingen; Övrigt
fi: Kämmenen pehmustetaso: Erittäin paksu; Paksu; Ohut; Keskipaksu; Ei mitään; Muu
da: Polstringsniveau i håndfladen: Ekstra kraftig; Kraftig; Let; Medium; Ingen; Anden
sk-SK: Úroveň polstrovania dlane: Extra hrubé; Hrubé; Tenké; Stredné; Žiadne; Iné
hu: Tenyér párnázottsági szintje: Extra erős; Erős; Enyhe; Közepes; Nincs; Egyéb
en: Palm padding level: Extra heavy; Heavy; Light; Medium; None; Other
bg-BG: Ниво на подплънката на дланта: Много плътно; Плътно; Леко; Средно; Без; Друго
el: Επίπεδο επένδυσης παλάμης: Πολύ παχιά; Παχιά; Λεπτή; Μέτρια; Καθόλου; Άλλο
de: Polsterungsgrad des Handschuhs: Besonders stark; Stark; Leicht; Mittel; Keine; Sonstige
es: Nivel de acolchado en la palma: Extrapesado; Pesado; Ligero; Medio; Ninguno; Otro
tr: Avuç içi dolgu seviyesi: Ekstra kalın; Kalın; Hafif; Orta; Yok; Diğer
cs: Úroveň polstrování dlaní: Extra silné; Silné; Lehké; Střední; Žádné; Jiné
hr-HR: Razina jastučenja dlana: Vrlo debela; Debela; Tanka; Srednja; Nema; Ostalo
lt-LT: Delno paminkštinimo lygis: Ypač storas; Storas; Lengvas; Vidutinis; Nėra; Kita
ko: 손바닥 패딩 수준: 매우 두꺼운 패딩; 두꺼운 패딩; 가벼운 패딩; 중간 패딩; 없음; 기타
ro-RO: Nivel de căptușire a palmei: Extra gros; Gros; Subțire; Mediu; Fără; Altele
vi: Mức độ đệm lòng bàn tay: Cực dày; Dày; Mỏng; Vừa; Không đệm; Khác
pt-BR: Palma, nível de acolchoamento: Extrapesado; Pesado; Leve; Médio; Nenhum; Outro
ru: Уровень защиты ладони: Очень плотная; Плотная; Легкая; Средняя; Без набивки; Другое
th: ระดับความหนาของวัสดุรองรับฝ่ามือ: หนามากเป็นพิเศษ; หนามาก; บาง; ปานกลาง; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
nl: Mate van palmvulling: Extra zwaar; Zwaar; Licht; Medium; Geen; Overig
zh-CN: 手掌衬垫防护等级: 超厚; 厚重; 轻薄; 中度; 无; 其他
it: Livello di imbottitura del palmo: Extra spesso; Spesso; Leggero; Medio; Nessuno; Altro
pt-PT: Nível de acolchoamento da palma da mão: Extra espesso; Espesso; Fino; Médio; Nenhum; Outro
ja: 手のひらパッドレベル: エクストラヘビー; ヘビー; ライト; ミディアム; なし; その他